Utah statutes.
20A-1-201.5.   Primary election dates.
(1)  A regular primary election shall be held throughout the state on the
fourth Tuesday of June of each even numbered year as provided in Section
20A-9-403, to nominate persons for national, state, school board, and county
offices.
(2)  A municipal primary election shall be held, if necessary, on the second
Tuesday following the first Monday in September before the regular municipal
election to nominate persons for municipal offices.
(3)  The Western States Presidential Primary election shall be held throughout
the state on the first Tuesday in February in the year in which a presidential
election will be held.
